test/src/gt-desc-yamls/noun-even_gt-desc.ana.yaml
  Noun - bárdnebealle: # BEALLE
    bárdnebealle+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: bárdnebealle-
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Nom: bárdnebealle
    bárdnebealle+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Nom: bárdnebealli
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Gen: bárdnebeale
    bárdnebealle+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Gen: bárdnebeali
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bárdnebealláme
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Ill: bárdnebeallái
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: bárdnebeallai
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bárdnebeliinan
    bárdnebealle+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bárdnebeliinan
    bárdnebealle+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: bárdnebeliinam
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: bárdnebeliinam
    bárdnebealle+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bárdnebeliideameguin
    bárdnebealle+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bárdnebeliideameguin
    bárdnebealle+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: bárdnebeliineameguin
    bárdnebealle+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: bárdnebeliineameguin
    bárdnebealle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: bárdnebealážiin
    bárdnebealle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: bárdnebealážiinna
    bárdnebealle+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: bárdnebealálažžan
    bárdnebealle+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: bárdnebealeheapme
    bárdnebealle+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [bárdnebealehin, bárdnebealeheapmi]



  Noun - čoalli: # AIGI
    čoalli+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: čoalle-
    čoalli+N+Sg+Nom: čoalli
    čoalli+N+Sg+Gen: čoali
    čoalli+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro: čoale
    čoalli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: čoalláme
    čoalli+N+Sg+Ill: čoallái
    čoalli+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: čoallii
    čoalli+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: čoliinan
    čoalli+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: čoliinan
    čoalli+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: čoliinam
    čoalli+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: čoliinam
    čoalli+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: čoliideameguin
    čoalli+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: čoliideameguin
    čoalli+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: čoliineameguin
    čoalli+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: čoliineameguin
    čoalli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: čoalážiin
    čoalli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: čoalážiinna
    čoalli+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: čoalálažžan
    čoalli+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: čoaleheapme
    čoalli+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [čoalehin, čoaleheapmi]



  Noun - muitobassi: # AIGI
    muitobassi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: muitobassi-
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Nom: muitobassi
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Gen: muitobasi
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro: muitobase
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: muitobassáme
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Ill: muitobassái
    muitobassi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: muitobassii
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: muitobasiinan
    muitobassi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: muitobasiinan
    muitobassi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: muitobasiinam
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: muitobasiinam
    muitobassi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: muitobasiideameguin
    muitobassi+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: muitobasiideameguin
    muitobassi+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: muitobasiineameguin
    muitobassi+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: muitobasiineameguin
    muitobassi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: muitobasážiin
    muitobassi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: muitobasážiinna
    muitobassi+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: muitobasálažžan
    muitobassi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: muitobasiheapme
    muitobassi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [muitobasihin, muitobasiheapmi]

  Noun - risteadni: # EADNI
    risteadni+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: risteadne-
    risteadni+N+Sg+Nom: risteadni
    risteadni+N+Sg+Gen: risteatni
    risteadni+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro: risteatne
    risteadni+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: risteadnáme
    risteadni+N+Sg+Ill: risteadnái
    risteadni+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: risteadnii
    risteadni+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: ristetniinan
    risteadni+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: ristetniinan
    risteadni+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: ristetniinam
    risteadni+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: ristetniinam
    risteadni+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: ristetniideameguin
    risteadni+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: ristetniideameguin
    risteadni+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: ristetniineameguin
    risteadni+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: ristetniineameguin
    risteadni+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: risteatnážiin
    risteadni+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: risteatnážiinna
    risteadni+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: risteatnálažžan
    risteadni+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: risteatneheapme
    risteadni+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [risteatnehin, risteatneheapmi]


  Noun - biehttalanváldi: # VALDI
    biehttalanváldi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: biehttalanválde-
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Nom: biehttalanváldi
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Gen: biehttalanválddi
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: biehttalanváldáme
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Ill: biehttalanváldái
    biehttalanváldi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: biehttalanváldii
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: biehttalanválddiinan
    biehttalanváldi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: biehttalanválddiinan
    biehttalanváldi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: biehttalanválddiinam
    biehttalanváldi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: biehttalanválddiinam
    biehttalanváldi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: biehttalanválddiideameguin
    biehttalanváldi+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: biehttalanválddiideameguin
    biehttalanváldi+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: biehttalanválddiineameguin
    biehttalanváldi+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: biehttalanválddiineameguin
    biehttalanváldi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: biehttalanválddážiin
    biehttalanváldi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: biehttalanválddážiinna
    biehttalanváldi+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: biehttalanválddálažžan
    biehttalanváldi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: biehttalanválddeheapme
    biehttalanváldi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [biehttalanválddehin, biehttalanválddeheapmi]
    
  Noun - sieluráfi: # RAFI
    sieluráfi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: sieluráfi-
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Nom: sieluráfi
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Gen: sieluráfi
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: sieluráfáme
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Ill: sieluráfái
    sieluráfi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: sieluráfii
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: sieluráfiinan
    sieluráfi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: sieluráfiinan
    sieluráfi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: sieluráfiinam
    sieluráfi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: sieluráfiinam
    sieluráfi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: sieluráfiideameguin
    sieluráfi+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: sieluráfiideameguin
    sieluráfi+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: sieluráfiineameguin
    sieluráfi+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: sieluráfiineameguin
    sieluráfi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: sieluráfážiin
    sieluráfi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: sieluráfážiinna
    sieluráfi+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: sieluráfálažžan


  Noun - proseassa: # STAHTA
    proseassa+N+G3+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: proseassa-
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: prosessa-
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Nom: proseassa
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Sg+Nom: prosessa
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Gen: proseassa
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Sg+Gen: prosessa
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: proseassame
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: prosessame
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Ill: prosessii
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Sg+Ill: prosessii
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: prosessai
    proseassa+N+G3+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: proseassai
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Com+PxSg1: proseassainan
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Sg+Com+PxSg1: prosessainan
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: prosessainam
    proseassa+N+G3+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: proseassainam
    proseassa+N+G3+Pl+Com+PxDu1: proseassaideameguin
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: prosessaineameguin
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Pl+Com+PxDu1: prosessaideameguin
    proseassa+N+G3+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: proseassaineameguin
    proseassa+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: proseassažiin
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: prosessažiin
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: prosessažiinna
    proseassa+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: proseassažiinna
    proseassa+N+G3+Der/lasj+A+Ess: proseassalažžan
    proseassa+Err/Orth+N+G3+Der/lasj+A+Ess: prosessalažžan
    proseassa+N+G3+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: proseassaheapme
    proseassa+N+G3+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [proseassahin, proseassaheapmi]


    
  Noun - kopiija: # IIJA
    kopiija+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: kopiija-
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: [kopija-]
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth-a/á+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: kopiijá-
    kopiija+N+Sg+Nom: kopiija
    kopiija+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: kopi
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: kopija
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth-a/á+Sg+Nom: kopiijá
    kopiija+N+Sg+Gen: kopiija
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: kopija
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth-a/á+Sg+Gen: kopiijá
    kopiija+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: kopiijame
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [kopijame]
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth-a/á+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: kopiijáme
    kopiija+N+Sg+Ill: [kopiijai, kopiijii]
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: [kopiijai, kopijai]
    kopiija+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: kopiijainan
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: [kopijainan]
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth-a/á+Sg+Com+PxSg1: kopiijáinan
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: [kopijainam]
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth-a/á+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: kopiijáinam
    kopiija+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: kopiijainam
    kopiija+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: kopiijaideameguin
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: [kopijaineameguin]
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth-a/á+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: kopiijáineameguin
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: [kopijaideameguin]
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth-a/á+Pl+Com+PxDu1: kopiijáideameguin
    kopiija+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: kopiijaineameguin
    kopiija+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: kopiijažiin
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: kopijažiin
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: kopijažiinna
    kopiija+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: kopiijažiinna
    kopiija+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: kopiijalažžan
    kopiija+N+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Ess: kopijalažžan
    kopiija+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: kopiijaheapme
    kopiija+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [kopiijahin, kopiijaheapmi]


  Noun - oalgevuotna: # GADDI
    oalgevuotna+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: oalgevuotna-
    oalgevuotna+N+Sg+Nom: oalgevuotna
    oalgevuotna+N+Sg+Gen: oalgevuona
    oalgevuotna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: oalgevuotname
    oalgevuotna+N+Sg+Ill: oalgevutnii
    oalgevuotna+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: oalgevuotnai
    oalgevuotna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: oalgevuonainan
    oalgevuotna+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: oalgevuonainan
    oalgevuotna+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: oalgevuonainam
    oalgevuotna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: oalgevuonainam
    oalgevuotna+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: oalgevuonaideameguin
    oalgevuotna+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: oalgevuonaideameguin
    oalgevuotna+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: oalgevuonaineameguin
    oalgevuotna+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: oalgevuonaineameguin
    oalgevuotna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: oalgevuonažiin
    oalgevuotna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: oalgevuonažiinna
    oalgevuotna+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: oalgevuonaheapme
    oalgevuotna+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [oalgevuonahin, oalgevuonaheapmi]
    oalgevuotna+N+Der/A+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: oalgevuonabui
    oalgevuotna+N+Der/A+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: oalgevuonamusaide

  Noun - beavdi: # GADDISHORT
    beavdi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: beavde-
    beavdi+N+Sg+Nom: beavdi
    beavdi+N+Sg+Gen: beavddi
    beavdi+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro: beavdde
    beavdi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: beavdáme
    beavdi+N+Sg+Ill: beavdái
    beavdi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: beavdii
    beavdi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bevddiinan
    beavdi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bevddiinan
    beavdi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: bevddiinam
    beavdi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: bevddiinam
    beavdi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bevddiideameguin
    beavdi+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bevddiideameguin
    beavdi+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: bevddiineameguin
    beavdi+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: bevddiineameguin
    beavdi+N+Der/A+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: beavddibui
    beavdi+N+Der/A+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: beavddimusaide
